Mississippi statutes. Title 77. Public Utilities and Carriers
Incorporation and Consolidation of Railroad Corporations

§ 77-9-101.
Preparation of application to governor by persons desiring creation of railroad corporation.

Persons desiring the creation and organization of a railroad corporation may prepare an application therefor, in writing, addressed to the governor, in which they shall declare:

The names, residence and post office of each of the applicants;

The terminal points of the proposed railroad; if either or both be without this state, the point at or near which the state line is proposed to be crossed;

The amount of authorized capital stock, with full particulars as to the class or classes thereof, including all their privileges and restrictions, and whether having a par value or being without nominal or par value;

The sale price per share, if desired, of stock without par value and authority for the board of directors to fix or change such sale price, if such authority be desired;

The number of shares of each class of stock necessary to be subscribed and paid for before the corporation shall commence business;

The line of the proposed railroad in this state;

The name by which the corporation is to be known;

The time within which it is hoped the railroad will be completed.

If the applicants be the purchasers of a railroad at an execution, judicial, deed in trust or mortgage sale thereof, they shall present with their application a certified copy of the conveyance under which they hold, and shall disclose in addition:

The facts of the purchase, the date thereof, when, where, and by what proceedings;

The name of the former railroad company or corporation, with its location and termini;

The amount of money paid for the property, and its real value, and the sum at which it is proposed to capitalize it.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3572; 1906, § 4073; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6702; 1930, § 6066; 1942, § 7717; Laws, 1938, ch. 347.

§ 77-9-103.
Issuance of proclamation by governor authorizing organization of railroad corporation.

Upon the receipt of the application, the governor shall submit the same to the attorney general, and obtain his opinion, in writing, to be indorsed thereon, whether or not it be in conformity to law. If the opinion be that the application conforms to law, and the governor believes that it is made in good faith and with bona fide intention on the part of the projectors to construct or cause to be constructed or to operate a railroad, as defined in the application, and there be no valid objection thereto, he shall issue his proclamation authorizing the persons to organize a railroad corporation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3573; 1906, § 4074; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6703; 1930, § 6067; 1942, § 7718.

§ 77-9-105.
Recording of application and proclamation.

The application and the proclamation of the governor shall be attached each to the other, and both shall be recorded in the office of the secretary of state, and also in the record of deeds of each county through which the projected railroad is to extend, at the expense of the projectors. The record in the secretary of state’s office shall be made before organization of the corporation, but that in the record of deeds may be made afterward, but before any corporate action shall be taken in the county.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3574; 1906, § 4075; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6704; 1930, § 6068; 1942, § 7719.

§ 77-9-107.
Organization and election of board of directors; selection of officers and adoption of bylaws.

Upon the issuance of the proclamation by the governor, authorizing them so to do, and its recordation in the office of the secretary of state, the projectors shall meet and organize, and elect a board of directors of such number as they may see fit. The board, when elected, may select a president and such other officers and agents as it may deem expedient, fix their duties and compensation, and adopt by-laws.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3575; 1906, § 4076; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6705; 1930, § 6069; 1942, § 7720; Laws, 1938, ch. 347.

§ 77-9-109.
Capital stock of railroad corporation.

Any railroad corporation heretofore or hereafter organized under the laws of the State of Mississippi may issue one or more classes of capital stock with or without nominal or par value. Such classes of capital stock may be issued with such designations, preferences and restrictions, if any, as may be stated and expressed in the charter of incorporation or in any amendment thereto, including restrictions and qualifications upon the voting powers of any such stock not in conflict with Section 194 of the Constitution of 1890, or the provisions of this section.

Preferred capital stock with or without nominal or par value may be made subject to redemption in such manner, at such time or times, and at such price or prices; be given such preferences as to net assets upon dissolution or winding up of the corporation, whether voluntary or involuntary; be given the right to receive such cumulative or non-cumulative dividends payable quarterly, semiannually or annually, and payable as a whole or in part before any dividends shall be set apart or paid on the common stock; be authorized to be issued in more than one series of the same class, each series carrying the same or different rates of dividends; be given full, qualified or no voting power (except as required by Section 194 of the Constitution of 1890); be made convertible into shares of other classes of preferred or common stock with or without nominal or par value; and be made subject to such other restrictions, limitations and qualifications, if any, as shall be stated and prescribed or provided in the charter of incorporation, or in any amendment thereto.

Capital stock without nominal or par value, whether common or preferred, may be issued by the railroad corporation from time to time for such consideration as may be stated in the charter of incorporation or any amendment thereto, or as may thereafter from time to time be fixed by the board of directors (by whatever name called), pursuant to authority granted them in the charter of incorporation or any amendment thereto. If the power to fix said consideration be not granted in such charter or amendment, then said power shall be given, by the consent of the holders of two-thirds (2/3) of each class of stock then outstanding and entitled to vote, at a meeting called for that purpose in a manner to be prescribed, by the by-laws. All shares without nominal or par value so issued, for which the full consideration, so fixed, has been paid or delivered, shall be deemed full paid stock, and not liable to any further call or assessment thereon, and the holder of such shares shall not be liable for any further payment thereon.

In any case in which the law requires that the par value of shares of stock of a corporation be stated in any certificate or paper, it shall be stated, in respect to shares without nominal or par value, that such shares are without par value. Whenever the amount of stock, authorized or issued, is required to be stated, with respect to shares without nominal or par value, the number of shares authorized or issued shall be stated, and it shall also be stated that such shares are without par value.

Every certificate of preferred stock issued shall show upon its face all of the privileges, restrictions, limitations and qualifications affecting the same, and the total amount of authorized capital stock of the class to which it belongs. Every certificate of common stock issued shall show upon its face the total amount of authorized common capital stock. Every certificate of stock issued, whether common or preferred, shall show upon its face the par value per share thereof, if any, otherwise the fact that such shares are without nominal or par value, and shall bear the words: “incorporated in Mississippi.”

No outstanding stock of any railroad corporation shall be retired if the corporation would be thereby rendered insolvent or its paid in capital be thereby reduced to less than the minimum amount required by its charter or amendments thereto, except upon dissolution.

In the event the board of directors of a railroad corporation, incorporated, chartered and organized prior to March 18, 1938, desire, they may, with the consent of the majority of the stockholders, exchange such stock as may be issued under the provisions of this section for stock previously issued, the par value of which was fixed at One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) per share by the projectors at the time of the organization of the railroad. In making such exchange the par value of the stock so issued shall be fixed at the actual value, at the time of the exchange, of the previously issued outstanding stock, and in no event shall any stock be issued of a fictitious value in exchange for any stock or for any other purpose.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3575; 1906, § 4076; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6705; 1930, § 6069; 1942, § 7720; Laws, 1938, ch. 347.

§ 77-9-111.
Filing of statement showing date of organization, amount of entire capital stock, and shares into which divided.

When organized, the board of directors shall file in the office of the secretary of state a statement, in writing, signed by the directors and sworn to by one of them, showing the date of the organization, the amount of the entire capital stock, and the shares into which divided. The secretary of state shall file and record the statement and certify the fact under the great seal. Thereupon the company so organized shall be a body corporate under the name specified, and may exercise its powers as such, but before so doing in any county, the said certificate, or a certified copy of it, with the application and governor’s proclamation, shall be recorded in the record of deeds thereof.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3576; 1906, § 4077; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6706; 1930, § 6070; 1942, § 7721.

§ 77-9-113.
Organization by purchasers of railroad sold under execution, deed of trust, or foreclosure.

When any railroad shall be sold under execution, or under a deed of trust, or by a decree of a court enforcing a mortgage or other lien, the purchasers thereof and their assigns and successors shall be entitled to and be invested with all the franchises, rights, powers, privileges, and immunities, not inconsistent with the provisions of this article, appertaining to and possessed by the company or corporation whose property and franchises were sold. However, an exemption from taxation contained in any charter shall not pass to the purchaser.

Such purchasers and their assigns and successors may file with the secretary of state a statement in writing to the effect that they desire to operate the railroad so sold in accordance with the provisions and requirements of the charter of the company to which it belonged, and they shall thereupon become vested with all the powers, rights, privileges and benefits thereof not inconsistent with the provisions of this article, in the same manner and to the same extent as if they were the original incorporators of said company, and they shall thereby become a railroad corporation.

The said purchasers and assigns and successors may meet and organize a new corporation under the provisions of this article, and have all the powers, franchises, rights, privileges, and immunities provided herein, and none other, and may give it such a name as may be adopted. They shall fix the amount of the entire capital stock of the new corporation, as represented by the property and franchise bought, and otherwise organize as provided in this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, §§ 3565, 3566; 1906, §§ 4065, 4066; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 6694, 6695; 1930, §§ 6097, 6098; 1942, §§ 7749, 7750; Laws, 1882, p. 47.

§ 77-9-115.
Amendment of railroad corporation charter.

The charter of any railroad corporation organized under the provisions of this article may be amended in the manner following. A resolution adopted by the stockholders owning a majority of the stock, which shall describe fully all proposed changes desired to be made in the charter, shall be submitted to the governor. The governor shall submit the same to the attorney general and obtain his opinion, in writing, to be indorsed thereon, whether or not it be in conformity to law. If the opinion be that the application conforms to law, and the governor believes that the charter should be amended as desired, he shall indorse his approval thereon. The resolution, together with the indorsements of the attorney-general and the governor, shall be filed with the secretary of state, who shall record the same and certify the fact under the great seal. The resolution shall likewise be recorded in the records of deeds of each county through which the railroad constructed or to be constructed under such charter may run. When all this shall have been done, the proposed amendment of the charter shall become effective and thereafter the charter shall stand as though the amendment described in the resolution had been originally incorporated as a part of the charter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 4078; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6707; 1930, § 6071; 1942, § 7722.

§ 77-9-117.
Amendment of charter to carry out plan of reorganization under federal laws.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any other statutes of this state specifying the procedure to be followed in obtaining amendments to charters of incorporation of railroad companies incorporated under the laws of this state, in all cases where a plan of reorganization of any such railroad company, pursuant to the provisions of any applicable statute of the United States relating to the reorganization of such corporations, has been or shall be confirmed by any court of competent jurisdiction, and where the amendment of said charter of incorporation is proper to put into effect and carry out the plan of reorganization and the decrees and orders of the court or judge relative thereto, the trustee or trustees of such corporation appointed in the reorganization proceedings, or the reorganization managers or committee designated in the plan of reorganization to consummate same, or such other person or persons as may be designated by the court or judge in the reorganization proceedings, shall have full power and authority to carry out such plan of reorganization and the decrees and orders of the court relative thereto without action by the directors or stockholders of such railroad company, including the power and authority to apply for and obtain, without action by the stockholders or directors, any and all amendments to the charter of incorporation which may be proper to carry out such plan of reorganization and the decrees and orders of the court relative thereto.

When the amendment of a charter of incorporation of a railroad corporation is desired under the provisions of this section, the person or persons authorized by this section to apply for same shall prepare a petition therefor which shall be properly acknowledged before a notary public or other officer authorized to take acknowledgments and which petition shall set forth in full the desired and proposed amendments to said charter. The said petition shall likewise contain a statement that the proposed amendments are proper to carry out the plan of reorganization and the decrees and orders of the court relative thereto, and shall give the title and venue of the proceedings and the date of the decree confirming the plan. Said petition shall be filed with the governor who shall submit same to the attorney general who shall give his opinion, in writing, as to whether or not said amendments be in conformity with the law.

If the attorney general be of the opinion that the proposed amendments are in conformity with the law, and if the governor believes that the amendments should be approved, he shall endorse his approval thereon, and the petition, together with the endorsements of the attorney general and the governor, shall be filed with the secretary of state who shall record the same in his office and certify same under the great seal of the state. The said petition, when so approved and certified, shall also be recorded in the office of the chancery clerk of each county through which the railroad may run and, when all of same shall be done, the said amendments to the charter shall become effective to the same extent as though the said amendments had originally been incorporated as a part of the said charter of incorporation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7722.5; Laws, 1952, ch. 228, §§ 1, 2.

§ 77-9-119.
Consolidation of railroad corporations.

Any railroad company organized and existing under the laws of this state and which is subject to the Interstate Commerce Commission Termination Act of 1995 shall have power to consolidate with any other railroad company, organized under the laws of this or any other state, and shall have power to purchase or lease the railroad, franchises, and properties of any other railroad company organized under the laws of this state, and to purchase and hold the capital stock or a part thereof of any other railroad company organized under the laws of this or any other state, wherever any such action has first been permitted by an act or acts of Congress and an order or orders of the U.S. Department of Transportation of the United States and of the commission. In the event of consolidation, the consolidated company shall become thereby a domestic corporation of the State of Mississippi.

Any railroad company organized and existing under the laws of this state and which is subject to the Interstate Commerce Commission Termination Act of 1995 shall have the power to merge with any other railroad company organized under the laws of this or any other state pursuant to the Mississippi Business Corporation Act.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 6105; 1942, § 7757; Laws, 1924, ch. 178; Laws, 2002, ch. 407, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2002; Laws, 2018, ch. 332, § 15, eff from and after passage (approved March 8, 2018).

§ 77-9-121.
Competing or parallel railroads shall not consolidate.

Except as provided in Section 77-9-119, it shall be unlawful for any railroad company to consolidate with a parallel or competing railroad company, or to allow its affairs to be in any manner managed, regulated, or controlled by any such parallel or competing railroad company, or permit its affairs to be so managed, regulated, or controlled by the same person or persons who manage, regulate, or control the affairs of such competing or parallel railroad company, under penalty of the forfeiture of the charters and franchises of such company or companies; all persons, agents, or companies so offending shall be liable to the further penalty of ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00). It shall further be unlawful for competing railroad companies operating parallel lines of road within twenty (20) miles of each other to lease or purchase, directly or indirectly, the opposing line or any part thereof or any interest therein. Such contracts, no matter in whose name made, are hereby prohibited under the penalties provided in this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3560; 1906, § 4057; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6685; 1930, § 6106; 1942, § 7758; Laws, 1898, p. 95.